tables/da-dk-g28-patches.cti
# Liblouis: Danish, patches for 8 dots grade 2
#
#  Copyright (C) 2014, Bue Vester-Andersen <bue@vester-andersen.dk>
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#------------
#
# This file contains work-arounds for various bugs in Liblouis that affects Danish 8 dots grade 2.
# It will be revised when these bugs are fixed.
#
# Version: Bue Vester-Andersen, 140511

# *** patches for various Liblouis bugs
# this file will be removed when the bugs are fixed


# *** The following lines are to work around the fact that uplow opcodes can'currently t be used in 8 dots
# if uplow opcodes are used, rules containing cap letters seem to be ignored
# However, without uplow, hyphenation will not work correctly for words with cap letters.
# these lines try to work around wrong hyphenation for words with starting cap.

begword Abst 17-12-1356
word And 17-12345
sufword Aner 17-1345-156
sufword Anet 17-1345-346
sufword Ane 17-1246
begword An 17-1345
sufword Arist 17-1235-24-1356
sufword Besk 127-15-123456
sufword Cast 147-1-1356
sufword Dansk 1457-1-1345-123456
sufword Derib 234567-24-12
word Deri 234567-24
sufword Dest 14567-1356
sufword Disk 1457-24-123456
sufword Dist 1457-24-1356
sufword Elsk 157-123-123456
sufword Energ 157-1345-156-1245
word Ener 157-1345-156
sufword Ene 157-1246
sufword Eni 157-1345-24
sufword Enige 157-1345-24-12456
sufword Enig 157-1345-35
sufword Enok 157-1345-135-13
begword Enor 157-1345-1346
begword En 1267
sufword Era 157-1235-1
sufword Eri 157-1235-24
sufword Ero 157-1235-135
sufword Esk 157-123456
sufword Est 157-1356
sufword Eta 157-2345-1
sufword Ethv 3467-2456
sufword Eth 157-2345-125
begword Eti 157-2345-24
sufword Eto 157-2345-135
begword Fora 1247-1346-1
sufword Forener 1247-1346-15-1345-156
sufword Forenet 1247-1346-15-1345-346
sufword Forene 1247-1346-15-1246
sufword Forsk 1247-1346-123456
sufword Forø 1247-1346-246
sufword Frenc 1247-1235-126-14
sufword Fre 1247-12356
sufword Genan 12457-126-1-1345
sufword Henim 1257-126-24-134
sufword Henover 1257-126-135-1236-156
sufword Heri 1257-156-24
sufword Heste 1257-15-1356-15
sufword Hestene 1257-15-1356-15-1246
sufword Hesten 1257-15-1356-126
sufword Hindren 1257-24-1345-145-1235-126
sufword Hindrer 1257-24-1345-145-1235-156
sufword Hindret 1257-24-1345-145-1235-346
sufword Hindre 1257-24-1345-145-12356
sufword Hver 24567-156
begword Hvor 347
begword Hv 24567
sufword Indimel 247-12345-24-146-123
sufword Indram 247-12345-1235-1-134
word Indre 247-1345-145-12356
sufword Inst 247-1345-1356
sufword Intet 247-1345-2345-346
sufword Konst 137-135-1345-1356
sufword Langst 1237-1-1345-1245-1356
sufword Mask 1347-1-123456
sufword Medej 1467-145-15-245
sufword Meta 1467-2345-1
sufword Mindre 1347-24-1345-145-12356
sufword Mindst 1347-24-12345-1356
sufword Musk 1347-136-123456
sufword Net 13457-346
word Omend 1357-134-15-12345
sufword Opera 1357-1234-15-1235-1
sufword Ora 1357-1235-1
begword Ori 1357-1235-24
sufword Oven 1357-1236-126
begword Over 1357-1236-156
sufword Pisk 12347-24-123456
begword Sk 1234567
begword St 13567
sufword Super 2347-136-1234-156
begword Søsk 2347-246-123456
begword Tel 12567-123
sufword Træsk 23457-1235-345-123456
begword Tysk 23457-13456-123456
sufword Uden 1367-12346
sufword Udst 1367-145-1356
sufword Undren 1367-1345-145-1235-126
sufword Undrer 1367-1345-145-1235-156
sufword Undret 1367-1345-145-1235-346
sufword Undre 1367-1345-145-12356
sufword Venst 12367-126-1356
sufword Vorden 12367-1346-12346
begword Æn 3457-1345


nofor always a 6-1
nofor always b 6-12
nofor always c 6-14
nofor always d 6-145
nofor always e 6-15
nofor always f 6-124
nofor always g 6-1245
nofor always h 6-125
nofor always j 6-245
nofor always k 6-13
nofor always l 6-123
nofor always m 6-134
nofor always n 6-1345
nofor always o 6-135
nofor always p 6-1234
nofor always q 6-12345
nofor always r 6-1235
nofor always s 6-234
nofor always t 6-2345
nofor always u 6-136
nofor always v 6-1236
nofor always w 6-2456
nofor always x 6-1346
nofor always y 6-13456
nofor always z 6-1356
nofor always æ 6-345
nofor always ø 6-246
nofor always å 6-16

nofor always A 6-17
nofor always B 6-127
nofor always C 6-147
nofor always D 6-1457
nofor always E 6-157
nofor always F 6-1247
nofor always G 6-12457
nofor always H 6-1257
nofor always J 6-2457
nofor always K 6-137
nofor always L 6-1237
nofor always M 6-1347
nofor always N 6-13457
nofor always O 6-1357
nofor always P 6-12347
nofor always Q 6-123457
nofor always R 6-12357
nofor always S 6-2347
nofor always T 6-23457
nofor always U 6-1367
nofor always V 6-12367
nofor always W 6-24567
nofor always X 6-13467
nofor always Y 6-134567
nofor always Z 6-13567
nofor always Æ 6-3457
nofor always Ø 6-2467
nofor always Å 6-167

# if a word contraction is followed by a punctuation and another word immediately after,
# The contracted word before the punctuation will back-translate as its components
class wordlimit /,!.:’()?"'\x00ab_\x201d\x0094\x2019\x0092\x00bb
nofor before wordlimit begword af 356
nofor before wordlimit begword aldrig 1-35
nofor before wordlimit begword aig =
nofor before wordlimit begword alle 1-15
nofor before wordlimit begword allerede 1-123-1235
nofor before wordlimit begword alligevel 1-123-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword altid 1-2345-145
nofor before wordlimit begword altså 1-16
nofor before wordlimit begword at 1

nofor before wordlimit begword blevet 12-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword blev 12-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword blive 12-3456
nofor before wordlimit begword bve 12-1236-15
nofor before wordlimit begword bliver 12

nofor before wordlimit begword derefter 23456-1356
nofor before wordlimit begword derst =
nofor before wordlimit begword deres 256
nofor before wordlimit begword derfor 23456-124
nofor before wordlimit begword derf =
nofor before wordlimit begword derigennem 23456-24-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword derige 1456-1235-24-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword dermed 23456-134
nofor before wordlimit begword derm =
nofor before wordlimit begword derned 23456-1246
nofor before wordlimit begword derne =
nofor before wordlimit begword derop 23456-135
nofor before wordlimit begword dero =
nofor before wordlimit begword derover 23456-1346
nofor before wordlimit begword deror =
nofor before wordlimit begword derpå 23456-1234
nofor before wordlimit begword derp =
nofor before wordlimit begword dersom 23456-234
nofor before wordlimit begword ders =
nofor before wordlimit begword dertil 23456-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword dert =
nofor before wordlimit begword derunder 23456-12345
nofor before wordlimit begword derved 23456-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword din 145-1345
nofor before wordlimit begword disse 145-234
nofor before wordlimit begword dit 145-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword du 145

nofor before wordlimit begword efter 1356
nofor before wordlimit begword eller 15
nofor before wordlimit begword endnu 15-136

nofor before wordlimit begword fik 124-13
nofor before wordlimit begword fordi 124-145
nofor before wordlimit begword forskellige 124-123456-15
nofor before wordlimit begword fske =
nofor before wordlimit begword forskelligt 124-123456-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword fskt =
nofor before wordlimit begword forskellig 124-123456
nofor before wordlimit begword fsk =
nofor before wordlimit begword for 124
nofor before wordlimit begword fra 235
nofor before wordlimit begword første 124-1356-15
nofor before wordlimit begword først 124-1356
nofor before wordlimit begword før 246

nofor before wordlimit begword ganske 1245-123456
nofor before wordlimit begword gennem 12456
nofor before wordlimit begword ge =
nofor before wordlimit begword gik 1245-13
nofor before wordlimit begword gør 1245

nofor before wordlimit begword ham 236
nofor before wordlimit begword hans 13456-234
nofor before wordlimit begword han 13456
nofor before wordlimit begword har 125
nofor before wordlimit begword havde 125-1456
nofor before wordlimit begword hde =
nofor before wordlimit begword have 125-3456
nofor before wordlimit begword hve =
nofor before wordlimit begword helt 125-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword hendes 125-234
nofor before wordlimit begword hende 125-145
nofor before wordlimit begword hun 136
nofor before wordlimit begword hvad 2456
nofor before wordlimit begword hv =
nofor before wordlimit begword hvis 2456-234
nofor before wordlimit begword hvs =
nofor before wordlimit begword hvordan 34-1
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorefter 34-1356
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorfor 34-124
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorigennem 34-24-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorledes 34-15
nofor before wordlimit begword hvormed 34-134
nofor before wordlimit begword hvornår 34-1345
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorover 34-1346
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorpå 34-1234
nofor before wordlimit begword hvortil 34-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorunder 34-12345
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorved 34-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword hvor 34

nofor before wordlimit begword igennem 24-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword ige =
nofor before wordlimit begword igen 35
nofor before wordlimit begword ig =
nofor before wordlimit begword ikke 24-13
nofor before wordlimit begword imidlertid 24-24

nofor before wordlimit begword jeg 245

nofor before wordlimit begword kan 13
nofor before wordlimit begword kommer 13-156
nofor before wordlimit begword ker =
nofor before wordlimit begword kommet 13-346
nofor before wordlimit begword ket =
nofor before wordlimit begword komme 13-146
nofor before wordlimit begword kme =
nofor before wordlimit begword kom 13-134
nofor before wordlimit begword kunne 13-1246
nofor before wordlimit begword kne =

nofor before wordlimit begword ligesom 123-234
nofor before wordlimit begword lige 123
nofor before wordlimit begword lille 123-123

nofor before wordlimit begword mange 134-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword mge =
nofor before wordlimit begword med 134
nofor before wordlimit begword megen 146-126
nofor before wordlimit begword meen =
nofor before wordlimit begword meget 146-346
nofor before wordlimit begword meet =
nofor before wordlimit begword mellem 146-134
nofor before wordlimit begword mem =
nofor before wordlimit begword men 146
nofor before wordlimit begword me =
nofor before wordlimit begword min 134-1345
nofor before wordlimit begword mit 134-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword måske 134-123456
nofor before wordlimit begword msk =
nofor before wordlimit begword måtte 134-1256
nofor before wordlimit begword mte =

nofor before wordlimit begword naturligvis 1345-2345-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword nd =
nofor before wordlimit begword ned 1246
nofor before wordlimit begword ne =
nofor before wordlimit begword nogen 1345-1345
nofor before wordlimit begword noget 1345-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword nogle 1345-123-15
nofor before wordlimit begword når 1345

nofor before wordlimit begword også 14-16
nofor before wordlimit begword og 14
nofor before wordlimit begword omkring 135-134-13
nofor before wordlimit begword op 135
nofor before wordlimit begword or =
nofor before wordlimit begword over 1346

nofor before wordlimit begword på 1234
